Hawaii statutes.
§501-136 Attachment and other liens; filing
or recording of. In every case where a writing of any description or a
copy of any writ is required by law to be filed or recorded in the bureau of
conveyances in order to create or preserve any lien, right, or attachment upon
unregistered land, such writing or copy, when intended to affect registered
land shall be filed or recorded and registered with the assistant registrar of
the land court. In addition to any particulars required in such papers for
recording with records of deeds, it shall also contain a reference to the
number of the certificate of title of the land to be affected and also, if the
attachment, right, or lien is not claimed on all the land in any certificate of
title, a description sufficiently accurate for identification of the land
intended to be affected. This section and section 501-138 do not apply to
liens for internal revenue taxes payable to the United States or to liens for
state taxes payable to the state department of taxation. [L 1903, c 56, §71; RL
1925, §3260; RL 1935, §5069; RL 1945, §12669; am L 1949, c 237, §1; RL 1955,
§342-69; HRS §501-136; am L 1973, c 128, §5; am L 1986, c 246, §15; am L 1989,
c 20, §4]

Rules of Court

Filing liens, see RLC rule 62.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next